Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.460

Washington achieving a better life experience program—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.330.462 through 43.330.468 unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Eligible individual" means an individual eligible for the Washington achieving a better life experience program pursuant to section 529A of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(2) "Governing board" means the Washington achieving a better life experience program governing board in RCW 43.330.466.

(3) "Individual Washington achieving a better life experience program account" means an account established by or for an eligible individual and owned by the eligible individual pursuant to the Washington achieving a better life experience program. Any moneys placed in these accounts or achieving a better life experience program accounts established in other states shall not be counted as assets for purposes of state or local means-tested program eligibility or levels of state means-tested program eligibility.

(4) "Washington achieving a better life experience program" means a savings or investment program that establishes individual Washington achieving a better life experience program accounts pursuant to section 529A of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(5) "Washington achieving a better life experience program account" means the account created in RCW 43.330.462(1), to be used only for purposes of Washington achieving a better life experience program administration and operation.

[ 2018 c 76 s 1; 2016 c 39 s 1.]